California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 Financial Disclosure Report retrieved from the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development as retrieved by the department on the retrieval date pursuant to Section 14169.59, for its fiscal year ending in the base calendar year; or (2) if a hospital’s Annual Financial Disclosure Report for its fiscal year ending in the base calendar year includes data for more than one day, but less than a full year of operation, the department’s best and reasonable estimates of the hospital’s Annual Financial Disclosure Report if the hospital had operated for a full year.

(i) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(j) “Designated public hospital” shall have the meaning given in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.1.

(k) “Director” means the Director of Health Care Services.

(l) “Exempt facility” means any of the following:

(1) A public hospital, which shall include either of the following:

(A) A hospital, as defined in paragraph (25) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(B) A tax-exempt nonprofit hospital that is licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code and operating a hospital owned by a local health care district, and is affiliated with the health care district hospital owner by means of the district’s status as the nonprofit corporation’s sole corporate member.

(2) With the exception of a hospital that is in the Charitable Research Hospital peer group, as set forth in the 1991 Hospital Peer Grouping Report published by
 the department, a hospital that is designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s most recently filed Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development Hospital Annual Financial Disclosure Report, as of the first day of a program period.

(3) A hospital that satisfies the Medicare criteria to be a long-term care hospital.

(4) A small and rural hospital as specified in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code designated as that in the hospital’s most recently filed Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development Hospital Annual Financial Disclosure Report, as of the first day of a program period.

(m) “Federal approval” means the approval by the federal government of both the quality assurance fee established pursuant to this article and the supplemental payments to private hospitals described pursuant
 to this article.

(n) “Fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on fee-for-service days.

(o) “Fee-for-service days” means inpatient hospital days as reported on the days data source where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” or “rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medicare traditional,” “county indigent programs-traditional,” “other third parties-traditional,” “other indigent,” or “other payers,” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(p) “Fund” means the Hospital Quality Assurance Revenue Fund established by Section 14167.35.

(q) “General acute care days” means the total
 number of Medi-Cal general acute care days, including well baby days, less any acute psychiatric inpatient days, paid by the department to a hospital for services in the base calendar year, as reflected in the state paid claims file on the retrieval date.

(r) “General acute care hospital” means any hospital licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(s) “General acute care per diem supplemental rate” means a fixed per diem supplemental payment for general acute care days.

(t) “High acuity days” means Medi-Cal coronary care unit days, pediatric intensive care unit days, intensive care unit days, neonatal intensive care unit days, and burn unit days paid by the department to a hospital for services in the base calendar year, as reflected in the state paid claims file prepared by
 the department on the retrieval date.

(u) “High acuity per diem supplemental rate” means a fixed per diem supplemental payment for high acuity days for specified hospitals in Section 14169.55.

(v) “High acuity trauma per diem supplemental rate” means a fixed per diem supplemental payment for high acuity days for specified hospitals in Section 14169.55 that have been designated as specified types of trauma hospitals.

(w) “Hospital community” includes, but is not limited to, the statewide hospital industry organization and systems representing general acute care hospitals.

(x) “Hospital inpatient services” means all services covered under Medi-Cal and furnished by hospitals to patients who are admitted as hospital inpatients and reimbursed on a
 fee-for-service basis by the department directly or through its fiscal intermediary. Hospital inpatient services include outpatient services furnished by a hospital to a patient who is admitted to that hospital within 24 hours of the provision of the outpatient services that are related to the condition for which the patient is admitted. Hospital inpatient services do not include services for which a managed health care plan is financially responsible.

(y) “Hospital outpatient services” means all services covered under Medi-Cal furnished by hospitals to patients who are registered as hospital outpatients and reimbursed by the department on a fee-for-service basis directly or through its fiscal intermediary. Hospital outpatient services do not include services for which a managed health care plan is financially responsible, or services rendered by a hospital-based federally qualified health center for which reimbursement is received pursuant to
 Section 14132.100.

(z) “Managed care days” means inpatient hospital days as reported on the days data source where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” or “rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medicare managed care,” “county indigent programs-managed care,” or “other third parties-managed care,” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(aa) “Managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on managed care days.

(ab) (1) “Managed health care plan” means a health care delivery system that manages the provision of health care and receives prepaid capitated payments from the state in return for providing services to Medi-Cal
 beneficiaries.

(2) (A) Managed health care plans include county organized health systems and entities contracting with the department to provide or arrange services for Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to the two-plan model, geographic managed care, or regional managed care for the rural expansion. Entities providing these services contract with the department pursuant to any of the following:

(i) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3).

(ii) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(iii) Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96).

(iv) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98).

(v) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(B) Managed health care plans do not include any of the following:

(i) Mental health plans contracting to provide mental health care for Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700).

(ii) Health plans not covering inpatient services such as primary care case management plans operating pursuant to Section 14088.85.

(iii) Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly organizations operating pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591).

(ac) “Medi-Cal days” means inpatient hospital days as reported on the days data source where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric
 care,” or “rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medi-Cal traditional” or “Medi-Cal managed care,” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(ad) “Medi-Cal fee-for-service days” means inpatient hospital days as reported on the days data source where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” or “rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medi-Cal traditional” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(ae) “Medi-Cal managed care days” means the total number of general acute care days, including well baby days, listed for the county organized health system and prepaid health plans identified in the Final Medi-Cal Utilization
 Statistics for the state fiscal year preceding the rebase calculation year, as calculated by the department as of the retrieval date.

(af) “Medi-Cal managed care fee days” means inpatient hospital days as reported on the days data source where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” or “rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medi-Cal managed care” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(ag) “Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on Medi-Cal days.

(ah) “Medicaid inpatient utilization rate” means Medicaid inpatient utilization rate as defined in Section 1396r-4 of Title 42 of the United States Code and as set forth in the Final Medi-Cal Utilization
 Statistics for the state fiscal year preceding the rebase calculation year, as calculated by the department as of the retrieval date.

(ai) “New hospital” means a hospital operation, business, or facility functioning under current or prior ownership as a private hospital that does not have a days data source or a hospital that has a days data source in whole, or in part, from a previous operator where there is an outstanding monetary obligation owed to the state in connection with the Medi-Cal program and the hospital is not, or does not agree to become, financially responsible to the department for the outstanding monetary obligation in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 14169.61.

(aj) “Nondesignated public hospital” means either of the following:

(1) A public hospital that is licensed under subdivision (a)
 of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, is not designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s most recently filed Annual Financial Disclosure Report, as of the first day of a program period, and satisfies the definition in paragraph (25) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98, excluding designated public hospitals.

(2) A tax-exempt nonprofit hospital that is licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, is not designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s most recently filed Annual Financial Disclosure Report, as of the first day of a program period, is operating a hospital owned by a local health care district, and is affiliated with the health care district hospital owner by means of the district’s status as the nonprofit corporation’s sole corporate member.

(ak) “Outpatient base amount” means the total amount of payments for
 hospital outpatient services made to a hospital in the base calendar year, as reflected in the state paid claims files prepared by the department as of the retrieval date.

(al) “Outpatient supplemental rate” means a fixed proportional supplemental payment for Medi-Cal outpatient services.

(am) “Prepaid health plan hospital” means a hospital owned by a nonprofit public benefit corporation that shares a common board of directors with a nonprofit health care service plan, which exclusively contracts with no more than two medical groups in the state to provide or arrange for professional medical services for the enrollees of the plan, as of the effective date of this article.

(an) “Prepaid health plan hospital managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on non-Medi-Cal managed care fee days for
 prepaid health plan hospitals.

(ao) “Prepaid health plan hospital Medi-Cal managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on Medi-Cal managed care fee days for prepaid health plan hospitals.

(ap) “Private hospital” means a hospital that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Is licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Is in the Charitable Research Hospital peer group, as set forth in the 1991 Hospital Peer Grouping Report published by the department, or is not designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s most recently filed Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development Annual Financial Disclosure Report, as of the first day of a program period.

(3) Does not satisfy the Medicare criteria to be classified as a long-term care hospital.

(4) Is a nonpublic hospital, nonpublic converted hospital, or converted hospital as those terms are defined in paragraphs (26) to (28), inclusive, respectively, of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(5) Is not a nondesignated public hospital or a designated public hospital.

(aq) “Program period” means a period not to exceed three years during which a fee model and a supplemental payment model developed under this article shall be effective. The first program period shall be the period beginning January 1, 2014, and ending December 31, 2016, inclusive. The second program period shall be the period beginning on January 1, 2017, and ending June 30, 2019. Each
 subsequent program period shall begin on the day immediately following the last day of the immediately preceding program period and shall end on the last day of a state fiscal year, as determined by the department.

(ar) “Quality assurance fee” means the quality assurance fee assessed pursuant to Section 14169.52 and collected on the basis of the quarterly quality assurance fee.

(as) (1) “Quarterly quality assurance fee” means, with respect to a hospital that is not a prepaid health plan hospital, the sum of all of the following:

(A) The annual fee-for-service days for an individual hospital multiplied by the fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by four.

(B) The annual managed care days for an individual
 hospital multiplied by the managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by four.

(C) The annual Medi-Cal days for an individual hospital multiplied by the Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by four.

(2) “Quarterly quality assurance fee” means, with respect to a hospital that is a prepaid health plan hospital, the sum of all of the following:

(A) The annual fee-for-service days for an individual hospital multiplied by the fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by four.

(B) The annual managed care days for an individual hospital multiplied by the prepaid health plan hospital managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by four.

(C) The annual Medi-Cal managed care fee days for an individual hospital multiplied by the prepaid health plan hospital Medi-Cal managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by four.

(D) The annual Medi-Cal fee-for-service days for an individual hospital multiplied by the Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by four.

(at) “Rebase calculation year” means a state fiscal year during which the department shall rebase the data, including, but not limited to, the days data source, used for the following: acute psychiatric days, annual fee-for-service days, annual managed care days, annual Medi-Cal days, fee-for-service days, general acute care days, high acuity days, managed care days, Medi-Cal days, Medi-Cal fee-for-service days, Medi-Cal managed care days, Medi-Cal managed care fee days, outpatient base amount, and transplant days, pursuant
 to Section 14169.59. Beginning with the third program period, the rebase calculation year for a program period shall be the last subject fiscal year of the immediately preceding program period.

(au) “Rebase year” means the first state fiscal year of a program period and shall immediately follow a rebase calculation year.

(av) “Retrieval date” means a day for each data element during the last quarter of the rebase calculation year upon which the department retrieves the data, including, but not limited to, the days data source, used for the following: acute psychiatric days, annual fee-for-service days, annual managed care days, annual Medi-Cal days, fee-for-service days, general acute care days, high acuity days, managed care days, Medi-Cal days, Medi-Cal fee-for-service days, Medi-Cal managed care days, Medi-Cal managed care fee days, outpatient base amount, and transplant days,
 pursuant to Section 14169.59. The retrieval date for each data element may be a different date within the quarter as determined to be necessary and appropriate by the department.

(aw) “Subacute supplemental rate” means a fixed proportional supplemental payment for acute inpatient services based on a hospital’s prior provision of Medi-Cal subacute services.

(ax) “Subject fiscal quarter” means a state fiscal quarter beginning on or after the first day of a program period and ending on or before the last day of a program period.

(ay) “Subject fiscal year” means a state fiscal year beginning on or after the first day of a program period and ending on or before the last day of a program period.

(az) “Subject month” means a calendar month beginning on or
 after the first day of a program period and ending on or before the last day of a program period.

(ba) “Transplant days” means the number of Medi-Cal days for Medicare Severity-Diagnosis Related Groups (MS-DRGs) 1, 2, 5 to 10, inclusive, 14, 15, or 652, according to the Patient Discharge Data File Documentation from the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development for the base calendar year accessed on the retrieval date.

(bb) “Transplant per diem supplemental rate” means a fixed per diem supplemental payment for transplant days.

(bc) “Upper payment limit” means a federal upper payment limit on the amount of the Medicaid payment for which federal financial participation is available for a class of service and a class of health care providers, as specified in Part 447 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations. The applicable upper payment limit shall be separately calculated for inpatient and outpatient hospital services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 26.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.  This section was added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.52.

(a) There shall be imposed on each general acute care hospital that is not an exempt facility a quality assurance fee, except that a quality assurance fee under this article shall not be imposed on a converted hospital for the periods when the hospital is a public hospital or a new hospital with respect to a program period.

(b) The department shall compute the quarterly quality assurance fee for each subject fiscal year during a program period pursuant to Section 14169.59.

(c) Subject to Section 14169.63, on the later of the date of the department’s receipt of federal approval or the first day of each program period, the following shall commence:

(1) Within 10 business days following receipt of the notice of federal approval, the department shall send notice to each hospital subject to the quality assurance fee, which shall contain the following information:

(A) The date that the state received notice of federal approval.

(B) The quarterly quality assurance fee for each subject fiscal year.

(C) The date on which each payment is due.

(2) The hospitals shall pay the quarterly quality assurance fee, based on a schedule developed by the department. The department shall establish the date that each payment is due, provided that the first payment shall be due no earlier than 20 days following the department sending the notice pursuant to paragraph (1), and the payments shall be paid at least one month apart, but if possible, the payments shall be paid on a quarterly basis.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the amount of each hospital’s quarterly quality assurance fee for a program period that has not been paid by the hospital before 15 days prior to the end of a program period shall be paid by the hospital no later than 15 days prior to the end of a program period.

(4) Each hospital described in subdivision (a) shall pay the quarterly quality assurance fees that are due, if any, in the amounts and at the times set forth in the notice unless superseded by a subsequent notice from the department.

(d) The quality assurance fee, as assessed pursuant to this section, shall be paid by each hospital subject to the fee to the department for deposit in the fund. Deposits may be accepted at any time and shall be credited toward the program period for which the fees were assessed. This article shall not affect the ability of a hospital to pay fees assessed for a program period after the end of that program period.

(e) This section shall become inoperative if the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services denies approval for, or does not approve before December 1, 2016, the
 implementation of the quality assurance fee pursuant to this article or the supplemental payments to private hospitals pursuant to this article for the first program period.

(f) In no case shall the aggregate fees collected in a federal fiscal year pursuant to this section, former Section 14167.32, Section 14168.32, and Section 14169.32 exceed the maximum percentage of the annual aggregate net patient revenue for hospitals subject to the fee that is prescribed pursuant to federal law and regulations as necessary to preclude a finding that an indirect guarantee has been created.

(g) (1) Interest shall be assessed on quality assurance fees not paid on the date due at the greater of 10 percent per annum or the rate at which the department assesses interest on Medi-Cal program overpayments to hospitals that are not repaid when due. Interest shall begin to accrue
 the day after the date the payment was due and shall be deposited in the fund.

(2) In the event that any fee payment is more than 60 days overdue, a penalty equal to the interest charge described in paragraph (1) shall be assessed and due for each month for which the payment is not received after 60 days.

(h) When a hospital fails to pay all or part of the quality assurance fee on or before the date that payment is due, the department may immediately begin to deduct the unpaid assessment and interest from any Medi-Cal payments owed to the hospital, or, in accordance with Section 12419.5 of the Government Code, from any other state payments owed to the hospital until the full amount is recovered. All amounts, except penalties, deducted by the department under this subdivision shall be deposited in the fund. The remedy provided to the department by this section is in addition to
 other remedies available under law.

(i) The payment of the quality assurance fee shall not be considered as an allowable cost for Medi-Cal cost reporting and reimbursement purposes.

(j) The department shall work in consultation with the hospital community to implement this article.

(k) This subdivision creates a contractually enforceable promise on behalf of the state to use the proceeds of the quality assurance fee, including any federal matching funds, solely and exclusively for the purposes set forth in this article, to limit the amount of the proceeds of the quality assurance fee to be used to pay for the health care coverage of children as provided in Section 14169.53, to limit any payments for the department’s costs of administration to the amounts set forth in this article, to maintain and continue prior
 reimbursement levels as set forth in Section 14169.68 on the effective date of that section, and to otherwise comply with all its obligations set forth in this article, provided that amendments that arise from, or have as a basis for, a decision, advice, or determination by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services relating to federal approval of the quality assurance fee or the payments set forth in this article shall control for the purposes of this subdivision.

(l) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the director may waive any or all interest and penalties assessed under this article in the event that the director determines, in his or her sole discretion, that the hospital has demonstrated that imposition of the full quality assurance fee on the timelines applicable under this article has a high likelihood of creating a financial hardship for the hospital or a significant danger of reducing the provision of
 needed health care services.

(2) Waiver of some or all of the interest or penalties under this subdivision shall be conditioned on the hospital’s agreement to make fee payments, or to have the payments withheld from payments otherwise due from the Medi-Cal program to the hospital, on a schedule developed by the department that takes into account the financial situation of the hospital and the potential impact on services.

(3) A decision by the director under this subdivision shall not be subject to judicial review.

(4) If fee payments are remitted to the department after the date determined by the department to be the final date for calculating the final supplemental payments for a program period under this article, the fee payments shall be refunded to general acute care hospitals, pro rata with the amount of
 quality assurance fee paid by the hospital in the program period, subject to the limitations of federal law. If federal rules prohibit the refund described in this paragraph, the excess funds shall be used as quality assurance fees for the next program period for general acute care hospitals, pro rata with the quality assurance fees paid by the hospital for the program period.

(5) If during the implementation of this article, fee payments that were due under former Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) and former Article 5.22 (commencing with Section 14167.31), or former Article 5.226 (commencing with Section 14168.1) and Article 5.227 (commencing with Section 14168.31), or Article 5.228 (commencing with Section 14169.1) and Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31) are remitted to the department under a payment plan or for any other reason, and the final date for calculating the final supplemental payments under those articles
 has passed, then those fee payments shall be deposited in the fund to support the uses established by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 27.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Section conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (e).   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.  This section was added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.53.

(a) (1) All fees required to be paid to the state pursuant to this article shall be paid in the form of remittances payable to the department.

(2) The department shall directly transmit the fee payments to the Treasurer to be deposited in the fund. Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, any interest and dividends earned on deposits in the fund from the proceeds of the fee assessed pursuant to this article shall be retained in the fund for purposes specified in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 14167.35, subdivision (b) of Section 14168.33, and subdivision (b) of Section 14169.33, all funds from the
 proceeds of the fee assessed pursuant to this article in the fund, together with any interest and dividends earned on money in the fund, shall continue to be used exclusively to enhance federal financial participation for hospital services under the Medi-Cal program, to provide additional reimbursement to, and to support quality improvement efforts of, hospitals, and to minimize uncompensated care provided by hospitals to uninsured patients, as well as to pay for the state’s administrative costs and to provide funding for children’s health coverage, in the following order of priority:

(A) (i) To pay for the department’s staffing and administrative costs directly attributable to implementing this article, not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), except as provided in clause (ii), for each subject fiscal quarter, exclusive of any federal matching funds.

(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, during any fiscal quarter for which the department incurs staffing or administrative costs due to the implementation of the federal Medicaid pass-through payment requirements codified in Section 438.6 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations as of March 20, 2017, or other federal requirements imposed as of the effective date of the act that added this clause, which significantly impact the implementation of this article, to pay for the department’s staffing and administrative costs that are directly attributable to implementing this article, not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for each subject fiscal quarter, exclusive of any federal matching funds.

(B) To pay for the health care coverage, as described in subdivision (g), except that for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 fiscal year, the amount for children’s health care coverage shall be one hundred
 fifty-five million dollars ($155,000,000) for each subject fiscal quarter, exclusive of any federal matching funds.

(C) To make increased capitation payments to managed health care plans pursuant to this article and Section 14169.82, including the nonfederal share of capitation payments to managed health care plans pursuant to this article and Section 14169.82 for services provided to individuals who meet the eligibility requirements in Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII)), and who meet the conditions described in Section 1905(y) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(y)).

(D) To make increased payments and direct grants to hospitals pursuant to this article and Section 14169.83, including the nonfederal share of payments to hospitals under this article and Section 14169.83 for
 services provided to individuals who meet the eligibility requirements in Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII)), and who meet the conditions described in Section 1905(y) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(y)).

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 14167.35, subdivision (b) of Section 14168.33, and subdivision (b) of Section 14169.33, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated during the first program period only, without regard to fiscal year, for the purposes of this article, Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31), Article 5.228 (commencing with Section 14169.1), Article 5.227 (commencing with Section 14168.31), former Article 5.226 (commencing with Section 14168.1), former Article 5.22 (commencing with Section 14167.31), and former Article 5.21
 (commencing with Section 14167.1).

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, for the second program period and subsequent program periods, the moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, for the purposes of this article and Sections 14169.82 and 14169.83.

(c) Any amounts of the quality assurance fee collected in excess of the funds required to implement subdivision (b), including any funds recovered under subdivision (d) of Section 14169.61, shall be refunded to general acute care hospitals, pro rata with the amount of quality assurance fee paid by the hospital, subject to the limitations of federal law. If federal rules prohibit the refund described in this subdivision, the excess funds shall be used as quality assurance fees for the next program period for general acute care hospitals, pro rata with the amount of quality assurance fees paid by
 the hospital for the program period.

(d) Any methodology or other provision specified in this article may be modified by the department, in consultation with the hospital community, to the extent necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations to obtain federal approval or to enhance the probability that federal approval can be obtained, provided the modifications do not violate the spirit, purposes, and intent of this article and are not inconsistent with the conditions of implementation set forth in Section 14169.72. The department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature 30 days prior to implementation of a modification pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) The department, in consultation with the hospital community, shall make adjustments, as necessary, to the amounts calculated
 pursuant to Section 14169.52 in order to ensure compliance with the federal requirements set forth in Section 433.68 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or elsewhere in federal law.

(f) The department shall request approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the implementation of this article. In making this request, the department shall seek specific approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to exempt providers identified in this article as exempt from the fees specified, including the submission, as may be necessary, of a request for waiver of the broad-based requirement, waiver of the uniform fee requirement, or both, pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 433.68 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(g) (1) For purposes of this subdivision, the following
 definitions shall apply:

(A) “Actual net benefit” means the net benefit determined by the department for a net benefit period after the conclusion of the net benefit period using payments and grants actually made, and fees actually collected, for the net benefit period.

(B) “Aggregate fees” means the aggregate fees collected from hospitals under this article.

(C) “Aggregate payments” means the aggregate payments and grants made directly or indirectly to hospitals under this article, including payments and grants described in Sections 14169.54, 14169.55, 14169.57, and 14169.58, and subdivision (b) of Section 14169.82.

(D) “Net benefit” means the aggregate payments for a net benefit period minus the aggregate fees for the net benefit period.

(E) “Net benefit period” means a subject fiscal year or portion thereof that is in a program period and begins on or after July 1, 2014.

(F) “Preliminary net benefit” means the net benefit determined by the department for a net benefit period prior to the beginning of that net benefit period using estimated or projected data.

(2) The amount of funding provided for children’s health care coverage under subdivision (b) for a net benefit period shall be equal to 24 percent of the net benefit for that net benefit period.

(3) The department shall determine the preliminary net benefit for all net benefit periods in the first program period before July 1, 2014. The department shall determine the preliminary net benefit for all net benefit periods in a subsequent
 program period before the beginning of the program period.

(4) The department shall determine the actual net benefit and make the reconciliation described in paragraph (5) for each net benefit period within six months after the date determined by the department pursuant to subdivision (h).

(5) For each net benefit period, the department shall reconcile the amount of moneys in the fund used for children’s health coverage based on the preliminary net benefit with the amount of the fund that may be used for children’s health coverage under this subdivision based on the actual net benefit. For each net benefit period, any amounts that were in the fund and used for children’s health coverage in excess of the 24 percent of the actual net benefit shall be returned to the fund, and the amount, if any, by which 24 percent of the actual net benefit exceeds 24 percent of the preliminary net
 benefit shall be available from the fund to the department for children’s health coverage. The department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of the results of the reconciliation for each net benefit period pursuant to this paragraph within five working days of performing the reconciliation.

(6) The department shall make all calculations and reconciliations required by this subdivision in consultation with the hospital community using data that the department determines is the best data reasonably available.

(h) After consultation with the hospital community, the department shall determine a date upon which substantially all fees have been paid and substantially all supplemental payments, grants, and rate range increases have been made for a program period, which date shall be no later than two
 years after the end of a program period. After the date determined by the department pursuant to this subdivision, no further supplemental payments shall be made under the program period, and any fees collected with respect to the program period shall be used for a subsequent program period consistent with this section. This subdivision does not affect the department’s authority to collect quality assurance fees for a program period after the end of the program period or after the date determined by the department pursuant to this subdivision. The department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and fiscal and appropriate policy committees of that date within five working days of the determination.

(i) Use of the fee proceeds to enhance federal financial participation pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include use of the proceeds to supply the nonfederal share, if any, of payments to hospitals under this article for services
 provided to individuals who meet the eligibility requirements in Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII)), and who meet the conditions described in Section 1905(y) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(y)) such that expenditures for services provided to the individual are eligible for the enhanced federal medical assistance percentage described in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   (SB 849)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.    Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.    Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52. This section was added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.54.
